Louisiana, session 2026, HB741.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 3-I of Title 40 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 40:600.161, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 3-I. HOUSING FOR HUMAN TRAFFICKING SURVIVORS
§600.161. Housing vouchers; human trafficking survivors
A. For the purposes of this Chapter, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "Local housing authority" means any parish or municipal housing
authority.
(2) "Voucher" means a voucher meant to assist with obtaining housing for
individuals who meet certain requirements which includes but are not limited to a
voucher given pursuant to United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development's Section 8 Housing.
B. Local housing authorities shall give preference for vouchers to human
trafficking survivors.
C. A local housing authority shall verify that the person applying for the
vouchers complies with all of the following:
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 741 ENROLLED
(1) Meets all standards and requirements outlined in the respective voucher
program.
(2) Is a human trafficking survivor as indicated in a law enforcement report
or protective order, or as verified by a healthcare professional, a government agency,
a district attorney or assistant district attorney, or a qualified third party as defined
by R.S. 9:3261.1(B)(6).
D. A local housing authority shall not disclose the address associated with
any voucher given pursuant to this Section without the informed consent of the
person about whom information is sought, or as directed by a court order. Consent
for release may not be given by the abuser or alleged abuser of any minor or
incapacitated person, or the abuser or alleged abuser of the other parent of the minor.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.